ro-RO: Tipul miezului mingii de bowling: Asimetric; Glonț; Mască de gaze; Clătită; Quadfire; Simetric; Din trei piese; Din două piese; Altele
es: Tipo de núcleo para para bolas de bolos: Asimétrico; Bala; Máscara de gas; Panqueque; Quadfire; Simétrico; Tres piezas; Dos piezas; Otro
en: Bowling ball core type: Asymmetrical; Bullet; Gas mask; Pancake; Quadfire; Symmetrical; Three-piece; Two-piece; Other
fr: Type de noyau d'une boule de bowling: Asymétrique; Ogive; Masque à gaz; Pancake; Quadfire; Symétrique; Trois pièces; Deux pièces; Autre
bg-BG: Тип ядро на боулинг топка: Асиметричен; Куршум; Противогаз; Палачинка; Quadfire; Симетричен; От три части; От две части; Други
hu: Bowlinggolyó belső magjának típusa: Aszimmetrikus; Lövedék; Gázmaszk; Palacsinta; Quadfire; Szimmetrikus; Háromrészes; Kétrészes; Egyéb
nb: Kjernetype i bowlingkule: Asymmetrisk; Prosjektil; Gassmaske; Pannekake; Quadfire; Symmetrisk; Tredelt; Todelt; Annet
hr-HR: Vrsta jezgre kugle za kuglanje: Asimetričan; Metak; Plinska maska; Palačinka; Quadfire; Simetričan; Trodijelan; Dvodijelan; Ostalo
sv: Bowlingklotets kärntyp: Asymmetrisk; Bullet; Gasmask; Pannkaka; Quadfire; Symmetrisk; Tredelad; Tvådelad; Övrigt
vi: Loại lõi bóng bowling: Bất đối xứng; Đạn; Mặt nạ phòng độc; Bánh kếp; Quadfire; Đối xứng; Ba mảnh; Hai mảnh; Khác
ru: Тип ядра шара для боулинга: Асимметричное; Пулевидное; Противогаз; Блинообразное; Quadfire; Симметричное; Трехкомпонентное; Двухкомпонентное; Другое
pt-PT: Tipo de núcleo da bola de bowling: Assimétrico; Bala; Máscara de gás; Panqueca; Quadfire; Simétrico; Três peças; Duas peças; Outro
th: ประเภทแกนกลางของลูกโบว์ลิ่ง: แบบอสมมาตร; ทรงกระสุน; หน้ากากกันแก๊ส; แพนเค้ก; Quadfire; แบบสมมาตร; 3 ชิ้น; 2 ชิ้น; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta sredice kegljaške žoge: Asimetrično; Oblika naboja; Plinska maska; Palačinka; Quadfire; Simetrično; Tridelno; Dvodelno; Drugo
pl: Typ rdzenia kuli do kręgli: Asymetryczny; Pocisk; Maska gazowa; Naleśnik; Quadfire; Symetryczny; Trzyczęściowy; Dwuczęściowy; Inne
tr: Bowling topu çekirdeği tipi: Asimetrik; Kurşun; Gaz maskesi; Pankek; Quadfire; Simetrik; Üç parçalı; İki parçalı; Diğer
de: Typ des Bowlingkugel-Kerns: Asymmetrisch; Bullet; Gasmaske; Pancake; Quadfire; Symmetrisch; Dreiteilig; Zweiteilig; Sonstige
lt-LT: Boulingo kamuolio šerdies tipas: Asimetrinis; Kulkos formos; Dujokaukės formos; Blyno formos; „Quadfire“; Simetrinis; Trijų dalių; Dviejų dalių; Kitas
el: Τύπος πυρήνα μπάλας μπόουλινγκ: Ασύμμετρος; Σφαίρα; Αντιασφυξιογόνος μάσκα; Pancake; Quadfire; Σύμμετρος; Τριών τεμαχίων; Δύο τεμαχίων; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ jadra bowlingovej gule: Asymetrické; Projektil; Plynová maska; Palacinkové; Quadfire; Symetrické; Trojdielne; Dvojdielne; Iné
da: Kernetype for bowlingkugle: Asymmetrisk; Bullet; Gasmaske; Pandekage; Quadfire; Symmetrisk; Tredelt; Todelt; Andet
ja: ボウリングボールコアタイプ: 非対称; バレット; ガスマスク; パンケーキ; クアッドファイア; 対称; 3ピース; 2ピース; その他
zh-TW: 保齡球球芯類型: 非對稱; 子彈型; 防毒面具型; 鬆餅型; Quadfire; 對稱; 三件式; 兩件式; 其他
ko: 볼링공 코어 유형: 비대칭형; 불릿; 방독면형; 팬케이크; 쿼드파이어; 대칭형; 3피스; 2피스; 기타
zh-CN: 保龄球球芯类型: 非对称; 子弹型; 防毒面具型; 煎饼型; Quadfire; 对称; 三层; 两层; 其他
it: Tipo di nucleo della palla da bowling: Asimmetrico; Proiettile; Maschera antigas; A pancake; Quadfire; Simmetrico; Tre pezzi; Due pezzi; Altro
fi: Keilapallon ytimen tyyppi: Epäsymmetrinen; Luoti; Kaasunaamari; Pannukakku; Quadfire; Symmetrinen; Kolmiosainen; Kaksiosainen; Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de núcleo da bola de boliche: Assimétrico; Bullet; Máscara de gás; Panqueca; Quadfire; Simétrico; Três peças; Duas peças; Outro
nl: Type bowlingbalkern: Asymmetrisch; Kogel; Gasmasker; Pannenkoek; Quadfire; Symmetrisch; Driedelig; Tweedelig; Overig
cs: Typ jádra bowlingové koule: Asymetrické; Střela; Plynová maska; Palačinka; Quadfire; Symetrické; Třídílné; Dvoudílné; Jiné